Utah statutes.
13-11-5.   Unconscionable act or practice by supplier.

(1) An unconscionable act or practice by a supplier in connection with a consumer transaction violates this act whether it occurs before, during, or after the transaction.

(2)  The unconscionability of an act or practice is a question of law for the court. If it is claimed or appears to the court that an act or practice may be unconscionable, the parties shall be given a reasonable opportunity to present evidence as to its setting, purpose, and effect to aid the court in making its determination.

(3)  In determining whether an act or practice is unconscionable, the court shall consider circumstances which the supplier knew or had reason to know.

